Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 1
S

TATE FORESTRY COMMISSION

12-6-1. Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

"Commission" means the State Forestry Commission.

"Director" means the director of the State Forestry Commission.

12-6-2. Creation of State Forestry Commission; members; terms of office; ineligibility of Governor for membership; vacancies; effect of appointment when Senate not in session.

There is created and established a State Forestry Commission.

The commission shall be composed of seven members. Four of the members shall be owners, or representatives of owners, of 50 acres or more of forest land within the State of Georgia. Two members shall be manufacturers or processors of forest products, or representatives thereof. One additional member shall be a person other than a member of either such identified group. The members of the commission shall be appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate and shall hold office until their successors are appointed and qualified.

The term of office of all members appointed to the commission shall be for seven years each and until their successors are duly appointed and qualified.

The Governor shall not be a member of the commission.

Any vacancy on the commission shall be filled by appointment by the Governor for the unexpired term, subject to confirmation by the Senate. Any appointment, whether for a full term or to fill a vacancy, made when the Senate is not in session shall be effective until the appointment is acted upon by the Senate.

(Ga. L. 1921, p. 192, § 1; Ga. L. 1925, p. 199, § 1; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 21; Ga. L. 1937, p. 264, § 9; Ga. L. 1943, p. 180, §§ 1, 3; Ga. L. 1949, p. 1079, §§ 1, 2, 5; Ga. L. 1955, p. 309, §§ 12-14; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1082, § 1.)

12-6-3. Chairman; reimbursement of members for expenses; meetings.

The commission shall elect a chairman annually.

The members of the commission, including the chairman, shall receive such per diem subsistence allowances for each day of actual attendance at the meetings of the commission, as well as mileage to and from the place of meeting and their respective homes by the nearest practical route, as may be authorized by the commission. The per diem and mileage allowances received shall not exceed those authorized by law for other state commissions and boards. Such per diem and travel expense shall be paid from funds of the commission.

The commission shall meet at such times at the state capitol or at other points as it may determine, and it shall convene in all sessions upon call by the chairman or by a majority of the members of the commission.

(Ga. L. 1949, p. 1079, § 6; Ga. L. 1955, p. 309, § 15.)

Cross references.

- Legal mileage allowance,

§

50-19-7

.

12-6-4. Dismissal of members for failure to attend meetings.

If any member of the commission, for any cause, fails to attend three successive meetings of the commission without good and valid cause or excuse or without leave of absence from the chairman his office shall be declared vacant by the commission. The chairman shall notify the Governor of a vacancy on the commission, and the Governor shall fill the vacancy as provided by Code Section 12-6-2.

(Ga. L. 1949, p. 1079, § 7; Ga. L. 1955, p. 309, § 16.)

12-6-5. Powers and duties of commission generally; volunteer services.

The commission shall have power and authority:

To take all action appropriate to foster, improve, and encourage reforestation;

To engage in research and other projects for the ascertainment and promulgation of better forestry practices;

To offer aid, assistance, and technical advice to landowners relative to the preservation and culture of forests;

To receive gifts or donations made to it and to expend the same under the terms of such gifts or donations;

To conduct and direct fire prevention work and maintain equipment, personnel, and installations for the detection, prevention, and combating thereof;

To publish in print or electronically and distribute the results of its research and investigations;

To cooperate and contract with other agencies and instrumentalities of government, either county, municipal, state, or national, and with private persons or concerns for the advancement of the forests of this state; and

To engage in land conservation projects as provided by Chapter 6A of this title.

The director is authorized to accept the services of individuals without compensation as volunteers for or in aid of fire tower operation, urban tree planting and inventories, seedling deliveries, insect surveys and evaluations, tours and field days, staffing exhibits, facility maintenance, beautification projects, and any other activity in and related to the objectives, powers, duties, and responsibilities of the commission.

The director is authorized to provide for reimbursement of volunteers for incidental expenses such as transportation, uniforms, lodging, and subsistence. The director is also authorized to provide general liability coverage and fidelity bond coverage for such volunteers while they are rendering service to or on behalf of the commission.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, a volunteer shall not be deemed to be a state employee and shall not be subject to the provisions of law relating to state employment including, without limitation, those relating to hours of work, rates of compensation, leave, unemployment compensation, retirement, and state employee benefits.

Volunteers performing work under the terms of this Code section may be authorized by the department to operate state owned vehicles. They may also be treated as employees of the state for the purposes of inclusion in any automobile liability insurance or self-insurance, general liability insurance or self-insurance, or fidelity bond coverage provided by the commission for its employees while operating state owned vehicles.

No volunteer shall be authorized or allowed to enter privately owned or operated lands, facilities, or properties, except for emergency fire fighting purposes, without the express prior written permission of the owner or operator of such privately owned or operated lands, facilities, or properties; provided, however, that such prohibition shall not apply to lands, facilities, or properties leased to the State of Georgia.

The commission shall have the power and authority to create, establish, and operate a program or programs to facilitate, amplify, or supplement the objectives and functions of the commission through the use of volunteer services including, but not limited to, the recruitment, training, and use of volunteers.

The enumeration of specific powers in this Code section shall not be construed as a denial of others not specified in this Code section.

(Ga. L. 1921, p. 192, § 4; Ga. L. 1925, p. 199, §§ 3, 5, 6; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 21; Code 1933, §§ 43-201, 43-202, 43-205, 43-206; Ga. L. 1937, p. 264, § 9; Ga. L. 1943, p. 180, §§ 1, 3; Ga. L. 1949, p. 1079, §§ 1, 2, 5; Ga. L. 1955, p. 309, §§ 12, 17; Ga. L. 1993, p. 423, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 90, § 2-2/HB 1176; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-7/HB 642.)

Cross references.

- Grants by commission to counties in which are located 20,000 acres of state land from which such counties receive no tax revenue,

§

48-14-1

.

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2012, p. 446,

§

3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act." This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446,

§

3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90."

12-6-5.1. Legislative findings; reforestation incentives program authorized; powers of commission.

The General Assembly finds that 433,000 acres of trees were planted in Georgia in 1984, while 640,000 acres were harvested during that year for a net loss of over 200,000 planted acres. The General Assembly further finds that the forest industry is of fundamental importance to the economy of the State of Georgia and that increased reforestation is necessary to meet future demands for forest products and to promote economic development and additional employment opportunities within this state. The General Assembly further finds that many acres of farm land and other open land in Georgia are not currently being used to the best advantage and that a program to provide incentives to encourage reforestation on these lands would be of great benefit to the people of Georgia. The General Assembly further finds that increased reforestation would substantially reduce soil erosion, which continues to be a serious problem in Georgia, and would be of other value in preserving and protecting wildlife and other natural resources of this state. It is determined, therefore, that it is in the interest of the public health, safety, and welfare and would serve an important public purpose for the State Forestry Commission to establish a reforestation incentives program for the State of Georgia.

In accordance with the findings set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section, the State Forestry Commission is authorized to establish a reforestation incentives program to encourage the planting of trees on lands within this state which are suitable for that purpose but which are currently not being utilized or are not being properly utilized for that purpose. In establishing and maintaining the reforestation incentives program, the commission may:

Provide technical advice and assistance on reforestation to landowners and encourage such landowners to participate in the reforestation incentives program;

Provide seedlings or equipment to landowners for reforestation purposes pursuant to such terms, conditions, and requirements as the commission shall determine;

Define the types of land eligible for participation in the reforestation incentives program and establish limitations on such participation;

Define the class or classes of landowners who shall be eligible for participation in the reforestation incentives program; and

Provide for any other matters reasonably necessary for the commission to establish and maintain an effective reforestation incentives program.

The powers of the commission provided by this Code section are cumulative of other powers possessed by the commission pursuant to any other provisions of this part or pursuant to any other law and are not in lieu of such other powers.

(Code 1981, §

12-6-5.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 402, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 12/SB 465.)

12-6-6. Management, conservation, and protection of forest lands; sale of forest products from land managed by commission; production and sale of seedlings.

Any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, the State Forestry Commission is authorized to manage, conserve, and protect any forest lands or forest properties belonging to or under the jurisdiction and control of any department, board, commission, bureau, agency, or authority of state government. The State Forestry Commission shall manage such forest lands or forest properties subject to the special needs of the department, board, commission, bureau, agency, or authority and the use of such lands or properties by such department, board, commission, bureau, agency, or authority. Such management shall conform to the principles of sound forest management where consistent with the use of such lands or properties. Management of forest lands or forest properties shall be undertaken by the State Forestry Commission only upon the written request of the department, board, commission, bureau, agency, or authority to which the lands or properties belong or which exercise control and jurisdiction over such lands or properties.

The State Forestry Commission is authorized to sell, contract for the sale of, offer, and accept bids for the sale of timber and other forest products grown or produced on lands subject to the management of the commission under this Code section. Such actions may be taken by the State Forestry Commission without the prior approval of any other department, board, commission, bureau, agency, or authority. The sale of such timber or forest products shall be made in the same manner as the sale of timber or forest products grown or produced on lands belonging to or under the jurisdiction and control of the State Forestry Commission. Any funds derived from the sale of any such timber or forest products shall be paid into the general fund of the state or to the department, board, commission, bureau, agency, or authority to which the forest lands or forest properties belong or which has jurisdiction and control over such lands or properties in the same manner as if such timber or forest products had been sold directly by the department, board, commission, bureau, agency, or authority.

In order to foster, improve, and encourage reforestation and in furtherance of its other duties and powers, the commission is authorized to contract for the production of seedlings, for the purchase of such seedlings for resale to Georgia forest owners or for fulfilling contractual obligations to Georgia forest owners, or for the sale of seedlings to other states and to the United States.

In order to carry out the provisions of subsection (c) of this Code section, the commission is authorized to enter into contracts with other agencies and instrumentalities of the state and local governments of Georgia, with other states, with the United States, with private persons, with corporations, or with other entities. Such actions may be taken by the commission without the prior approval of any other department, board, commission, bureau, agency, or authority of the state. The purchase or sale of such seedlings shall be made in the same manner as the purchase or sale of such seedlings grown or produced on land belonging to or under the jurisdiction and control of the commission.

(Ga. L. 1974, p. 458, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 561, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1385, § 1.)

Cross references.

- Sale and treatment of timber products generally,

§

2-14-80

et seq.

Grants by commission to counties in which are located 20,000 acres of state land from which such counties receive no tax revenue,

§

48-14-1

.

12-6-7. Federal financial aid - Participation in rural fire prevention and control program; contributions by counties and fire departments.

The commission may enter into agreements with the secretary of agriculture of the United States in order to participate in the rural fire prevention and control program authorized by the Cooperative Forestry Assistance Act of 1978, Public Law 95-313.

With respect to the formulation of projects relating to fire protection of livestock, wildlife, crops, pastures, orchards, range land, woodland, farmsteads, or other improvements, and other values in rural areas, for which such federal matching funds are available, any participating county or fire department may contribute to the nonfederal matching share and may also contribute such other nonfederal cooperation as may be deemed necessary by the commission.

(Ga. L. 1974, p. 559, § 1.)

U.S. Code.

- The federal Cooperative Forestry Assistance Act of 1978, referred to in subsection (a), is codified principally at 16 U.S.C.

§

2101 et seq.

12-6-8. Federal financial aid - Expenditure of funds for forest farming and marketing of forest products.

The commission shall be the designated agency to expend through the department all federal-aid funds available under the Cooperative Forestry Assistance Act of 1978, Public Law 95-313, for fire prevention and nursery work and for farm forestry or forest farming and nursery work. The commission shall also be the designated agency to expend through the department all other federal funds now in existence or to be created for the purpose of assisting private timber landowners in Georgia in the planting, management, and protection of their forests, and in the marketing of their forest products. All such funds shall be expended through regular Office of Planning and Budget channels, provided that those federal funds that may be appropriated or allocated to the Georgia Cooperative Extension Service under the Cooperative Forestry Assistance Act of 1978, or any other act of Congress, or any other source or allocation of federal funds for the purpose of carrying on agricultural or forestry extension work shall be made available directly to the Georgia Cooperative Extension Service.

(Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 24; Code 1933, § 43-104; Ga. L. 1937, p. 264, § 9; Ga. L. 1945, p. 390, § 1; Ga. L. 1946, p. 28, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 309, § 27; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 12; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 12.)

U.S. Code.

- The federal Cooperative Forestry Assistance Act of 1978, referred to in this Code section, is codified principally at 16 U.S.C.

§

2101 et seq.

12-6-9. Acquisition of land; gifts of land for use as lookout tower sites; abandoned tower sites; improvements on land subject to reversionary clause.

The commission shall have the right to acquire, in the name of the state, by purchase, lease, agreement, or condemnation, such land within the state as may be deemed necessary and proper. Condemnation proceedings shall be subject to the applicable provisions of law relating to the condemnation of property by the State of Georgia. The acquisition by the commission of any land, either by purchase or by condemnation, shall be construed as transferring a fee simple interest, unless the instrument conveying such interest, or the condemnation petition, clearly indicates otherwise.

The director, provided for in Code Section 12-6-11, is authorized to acquire in the name of the state, where the grantor makes a gift thereof to the state, small tracts of land not in excess of five acres, to be used as forest fire lookout tower sites. Title to such land may be conveyed by deeds containing reversionary clauses. Upon abandonment by the commission of such site after the site is no longer of use to it, the director is authorized to reconvey title by quitclaim deed to the grantor, his successors, or assigns, and the director is authorized to reconvey all tower sites subject to reversionary clauses which sites were acquired by the commission as gifts prior to March 3, 1955. However, in case of any abandonment or reconveyance under this subsection, the commission shall have the unqualified right to remove any improvements or fixtures, either temporary or permanent, placed on such property without regard to whether same would have, under general principles of law, become part of the realty, which right may be exercised any time before or a reasonable time after abandonment.

The director is authorized to improve with funds appropriated to the commission any real estate under its control or management which may be held under a deed containing a reversionary clause conditioned on the discontinuation of use for the purpose for which conveyed.

(Ga. L. 1925, p. 199, § 5; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 21; Code 1933, § 43-205; Ga. L. 1937, p. 264, § 9; Ga. L. 1955, p. 309, § 18; Ga. L. 1956, p. 377, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 615, § 1.)

12-6-10. Reports to General Assembly.

It shall be the duty of the commission, in cooperation with the director provided for in Code Section 12-6-11, to:

Annually submit reports to each regular session of the General Assembly together with such information as is necessary to show the condition of the forest resources of the state, with particular reference to the protection, preservation, and propagation of timber growth, and all other matters pertaining to the forest resources, and with recommendations for necessary legislation as to protection, reforestation, and management; and

Quinquennially submit reports to the General Assembly verifying the ability of forest resources in this state to meet the needs of the present without compromising the ability to meet the needs of future generations. The first such report shall be due not later than July 1, 2008. The director shall prescribe the manner, procedures, and data necessary to produce such report.

(Ga. L. 1925, p. 199, § 3; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 21; Code 1933, § 43-204; Ga. L. 1949, p. 1079, § 10; Ga. L. 1955, p. 309, § 19; Ga. L. 2007, p. 82, § 1/SB 176.)

12-6-11. Director - Appointment; qualifications; salary; reimbursement for expenses; term.

The commission shall appoint, by and with the advice and consent of the Governor, a director, who shall be the executive secretary and administrative officer of the commission. When seeking candidates for the position of director, emphasis shall be placed on identifying individuals who hold a Bachelor of Science degree in forestry or who have significant experience in forest management. The director shall receive a salary fixed by the commission plus actual expenses as provided for other state officials and employees and shall hold office at the pleasure of the commission. The present director shall continue to serve until removed by the commission.

(Ga. L. 1949, p. 1079, § 8; Ga. L. 1955, p. 309, § 20; Ga. L. 2007, p. 63, § 1/SB 116.)

Cross references.

- Inclusion of director in classified service of the State Merit System Personnel Administration,

§

45-20-2

.

12-6-12. Director - Duty of director to devote full time to office; power and duty of director to act for commission when commission not in session.

The director shall devote his full time to the duties of his office; and when the commission is not in session, the director shall have power, and it shall be his duty, to act in all matters as fully as the commission is authorized, except in such matters where the approval of the commission is specifically required by this part.

(Ga. L. 1949, p. 1079, § 8; Ga. L. 1955, p. 309, § 21.)

12-6-13. Director - Oath; bond; location of office.

The director shall take oath of office and give bond in the sum of $10,000.00 in the usual form required of state officials. The director shall have offices at the site of the state capitol or at such other place as may be recommended by the commission and approved by the Governor. The office of the director shall be the office of the commission.

(Ga. L. 1949, p. 1079, § 8; Ga. L. 1955, p. 309, § 22.)

12-6-14. Director - Eligibility of commission members for directorship or for employment under commission or director.

No member of the commission during his tenure of office or within two years thereafter shall be eligible for appointment as director or for any employment under the commission or the director.

(Ga. L. 1949, p. 1079, § 8; Ga. L. 1955, p. 309, § 23.)

12-6-15. Director - Adoption of rules, regulations, and methods of administration.

The director, with the approval of the commission, shall have the power to adopt all rules, regulations, and methods of administration necessary for the efficient operation of the activities of the commission as created and established by this part.

(Ga. L. 1949, p. 1079, § 9; Ga. L. 1955, p. 309, § 24.)

12-6-16. Director - Control of tree diseases and insect infestation.

Whenever the director or his agents determine that there exists an infestation of forest insect pests or an infection of forest tree diseases, injurious or potentially injurious to the timber or forest trees within the state, and that the infestation or infection is of such a character as to be a menace to the timber or forest growth of the state, the director shall declare the existence of a zone of infestation or infection and shall declare and fix boundaries so as to definitely describe and identify such zone of infestation or infection. The director or his agents shall give notice in writing by mail or otherwise to each forest landowner within the designated control zone advising him of the nature of the infestation or infection and the recommended control measures and offering him technical advice on methods of carrying out controls.

The director shall have the power, by rule or regulation, to declare and define areas of quarantine and to prescribe all needful rules and regulations relating thereto. Any person violating any such rule or regulation shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. The director or any other person is empowered to institute action in his name to enjoin any practice in violation of such rules or regulations, without regard to whether such practices would under general law constitute a nuisance and without regard to whether an adequate remedy exists at law. The commission or any of its duly authorized agents or anyone acting at their direction shall have authority at all times to enter upon any lands for the purposes of making investigations and otherwise carrying out this Code section, without incurring liability for trespassing.

(Ga. L. 1955, p. 309, § 25.)

Cross references.

- Control of plant diseases, pests, and pesticides, generally, T. 2, C. 7.

Power of Commissioner of Agriculture to declare quarantine against nurseries, groves, and other locations, because of infestation of dangerous insect pests or plant diseases,

§

2-7-20

.

12-6-17. Director - Regulation of controlled burning where drought or other conditions exist.

Whenever in the judgment of the director, because of drought or other conditions, controlled burning of woods, lands, marshes, refuse, or other combustible materials in any county or counties or in any area within a county constitutes an unusual hazard to property, the director may by order, rule, or regulation prohibit the setting on fire of any woods, lands, marshes, refuse, or other combustible materials within any county or counties or within any area within a county, or may permit such burning only upon such conditions and under such regulations as in his judgment are necessary and proper to prevent the destruction of property. Where by rule or regulation the setting on fire of any woods, lands, marshes, refuse, or other combustible material has been prohibited, no person shall set or cause to be set any backfire, except under the direct supervision or permission of a state or federal forest officer, unless it can be established that the setting of such backfire was necessary for the purpose of saving life or valuable property, the burden of proving which shall rest on such person claiming same as a defense. Any order, rule, or regulation promulgated by the director under the authority of this Code section shall have the force and effect of law.

Any person violating a lawful order or regulation promulgated under the authority of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(Ga. L. 1955, p. 309, § 26.)

12-6-18. Director - Expenditure of funds for benefit of lands under commission's control; sale and disposal of products from controlled lands.

When lands are acquired or leased under this part, the director, with the approval of the commission, is authorized to make expenditures of funds, not otherwise obligated, for the management, development, and utilization of such areas and to sell and otherwise dispose of the products from such lands.

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 264, § 9; Ga. L. 1955, p. 309, § 28.)

12-6-19. Director - Promulgation of rules and regulations as to lands under commission's control; sale, lease, or exchange of controlled lands.

The director, with the approval of the commission, is authorized to establish and from time to time alter rules and regulations governing the use, occupancy, and protection of the land and property under the commission's control and to preserve the peace therein. The director, with the approval of the commission, shall have full power and authority to exchange, sell, or lease lands under its jurisdiction when in the judgment of the director and the commission it is advantageous to the state to do so in the highest orderly development and management of state forests, provided that such lease, sale, or exchange shall not be contrary to the terms of any contract which the commission has entered into.

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 264, § 9; Ga. L. 1955, p. 309, § 29.)

12-6-20. Investigation and enforcement of forestry laws; powers of forestry investigators.

As used in this Code section, the term "forestry laws" means laws relating to forestry or timber resources and the protection, security, conservation, or sale of such resources.

(a.1)
The director, with the approval of the commission, may appoint investigators to enforce the forestry laws of this state.

The investigators so appointed and any fire-fighting crews under their direction may enter upon any land for the purpose of preventing and suppressing fires and enforcing the fire and other forestry laws of this state.

Investigators who have been so appointed shall be certified by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council after having successfully completed the course of training required by Chapter 8 of Title 35, the "Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Act," and thereafter shall be authorized and empowered to:

Make summary arrests for violations of the fire and other forestry laws of this state; and, in case of such arrests, the investigator shall as soon as possible deliver the arrested person or persons to the custody of the sheriff of the county wherein the offense was committed;

Arrest persons accused of violating any law which such investigators are empowered to enforce by the issuance of a citation, provided that the offense is committed in the presence of the investigator or information concerning the offense constituting a basis for arrest was received by the arresting investigator from a law enforcement officer, commission firefighter, or forester who observed the offense being committed. The arresting investigator may issue to the accused person a citation which shall enumerate the specific charges against such person and the date upon which such person is to appear and answer such charges. Whenever an arrest is made by the arresting investigator on the basis of information received from another law enforcement officer, commission firefighter, or forester who observed the offense being committed, such citation shall list the name of each officer, firefighter, or forester and each officer, firefighter, or forester shall be present when the charges against the offender are heard;

Execute search warrants and arrest warrants for criminal violations relating to the forestry laws of this state and to arrest, upon probable cause and without warrant, any person the investigator observes violating any criminal law of this state while carrying out his or her duties, provided that such person shall immediately be delivered to the sheriff of the county where the violation occurred; and

Carry weapons in order to execute their enforcement authority under this Code section.

Upon initiating any investigation regarding the potential theft or conversion of timber, the investigator shall promptly notify the sheriff or other law enforcement agency exercising jurisdiction within the county or municipality in which the investigator is conducting such investigation. No investigator shall request any other state law enforcement agency to render assistance in any investigation relating to the theft or conversion of timber without the consent of the sheriff or other law enforcement agency exercising jurisdiction within the county or municipality in which the investigation is conducted.

The director may, and in the case of a request by the Governor shall, authorize and direct investigators to cooperate with and render assistance to any law enforcement agency of this state or of any political subdivision of this state in any criminal case, in the prevention or detection of violations of any law, or in the apprehension or arrest of any person who violates the criminal laws of this state, any other state, or the United States, upon a request by the sheriff or chief law enforcement officer of any political subdivision of this state or by the Governor.

Nothing in this Code section shall repeal, supersede, alter, affect, or otherwise usurp the power of any other law enforcement officer of this state or of any political subdivision of this state.

If any person charged by citation as provided in paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of this Code section shall fail to appear in court as specified in the citation, the judge having jurisdiction of the offense may issue a warrant ordering the apprehension of such person and commanding that he or she be brought before the court to answer the charge contained within such citation and the charge of his or her failure to appear as required. Such person shall then be allowed to make a reasonable bond to appear on a given date before the court.

(Ga. L. 1925, p. 199, § 8; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 21; Code 1933, § 43-208; Ga. L. 1937, p. 264, § 9; Ga. L. 1952, p. 211, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 309, § 30; Ga. L. 2008, p. 444, § 1/SB 400; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 12/SB 46; Ga. L. 2014, p. 695, § 2/HB 790.)

Cross references.

- Forest fire prevention and control generally,

§

12-6-80

et seq.

12-6-21. Uncontrolled fire as constituting a public nuisance; duties and liabilities of person or entity responsible.

Any fire burning uncontrolled on any forested or cut-over brush land or grassland is declared to be a public nuisance by reason of its menace to life and property. Any person, firm, or corporation responsible either for the starting or for the existence of such fire is required to control or extinguish it immediately. If such person, firm, or corporation shall refuse or neglect to do so, any organized fire suppression force may suppress the nuisance thus constituted by controlling and extinguishing the fire; and the cost thereof may be recovered from the responsible person, firm, or corporation.

(Ga. L. 1937, p. 264, § 9; Ga. L. 1955, p. 309, § 31.)

Cross references.

- Authority of commission to enter lands for purposes of preventing, controlling, or suppressing forest fires,

§

12-6-84

.

Burning of woodlands, brush, fields, or other lands; destruction of or damage to material or device used in detection or suppression of wildfires; penalties for violations,

§

16-7-63

.

12-6-22. Investigation of tree diseases or insect infestation; notification of landowner; recommendations; effect of landowner's failure to act; disposition of proceeds derived from sale of trees.

The commission shall have the authority to enter upon any land on which the commission believes the trees are suffering from an infestation or infection for the purpose of determining whether such infestation or infection exists, the location thereof, and the extent and cause thereof. If an infestation or infection is found to exist by the commission, it shall notify the landowner of such condition and recommend a course of action by the landowner to prevent the spreading of the infestation or disease. If the landowner, within a reasonable period of time following such notification, fails to take action to prevent the spreading of the infestation or disease, then the commission may:

Fell and remove infested or diseased trees;

Fell and chemically treat infested or diseased trees;

Chemically treat standing infested or diseased trees; or

Take such other effective control methods as the commission deems appropriate.

Any proceeds derived from any sale of such trees shall be paid to the landowner.

(Ga. L. 1974, p. 426, §§ 1, 2.)

Cross references.

- Authority of commission to enter lands for purposes of preventing, controlling, or suppressing forest fires,

§

12-6-84

.